Utah statutes.
20A-3-604.   Notice of time and place of early voting.
The election officer shall give notice of the dates, times, and locations of
early voting by:
(1)  publishing the notice:
(a)  in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least
five calendar days before the date that early voting begins; and
(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least five calendar days before
the date that early voting begins; and
(2)  posting the notice at each early voting polling place at least five
calendar days before the date early voting begins.
